Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4594.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 16605. The following words, titles, or letters, or a combination of any of those words, titles, or letters, with or without qualifying words or phrases, are restricted in use only to those individuals who are authorized under this part to use the following terms and in a way prescribed in this part: (a) "Dentist", "doctor of dental surgery", "oral and maxillofacial surgeon", "orthodontist", "prosthodontist", "periodontist", "endodontist", "oral pathologist", "pediatric dentist", "dental hygienist", "registered dental hygienist", "dental assistant", "registered dental assistant", "dental therapist", "r.d.a.", "d.d.s.", "d.m.d.", "r.d.h.", and "d.t.". (b) Beginning September 1, 2022, "oral and maxillofacial radiologist", "dental anesthesiologist", "oral medicine doctor", "public health dentist", and "orofacial pain specialist". (c) Beginning 90 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subdivision, "dental specialist". Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4593 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.